Hawaii statutes.
§606-5 Free copies of certain decrees to
veterans. The clerk of any state court shall provide to any veteran of the
armed forces of the United States, the veteran's spouse, any member of the
immediate family of a veteran, or the next of kin of a deceased veteran, free
copies of decrees of divorce or adoption, when such copies are required for use
in connection with a claim based on service in the armed forces of the United
States. [L 1949, c 44, §1; RL 1955, §218-5; HRS §606-5; am L 1972, c 139, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next